Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2575.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
`SECTION 1. Chapter 45-24 of the General Laws entitled "Zoning Ordinances" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-24-33.1. Recovery houses.
(a) For purposes of this section, a NARR-certified recovery residence means a residential
structure that provides recovery support services for those people recovering from substance use
addiction and that complies with standards established by the National Alliance for Recovery
Residences (NARR).
(b) Except as otherwise provided within the general laws, any law, regulation or ordinance
regulating the zoning and use of a residential NARR certified recovery residence:
(1) Shall treat a NARR-certified recovery residence as a residential use of property which
shall have all the rights and responsibilities afforded to a residential use of property.
(2) Shall not subject the recovery residence to any restrictions, prohibitions or other
provisions, including provisions related to the state building or fire codes that are not contained in
the Rhode Island life safety code § 26.1.1.1.8.3. At no time shall a recovery residence house under
this chapter be given the designation of a commercial structure for fire and or building codes.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004987/SUB A/4
========